Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-110
County clerks; fees for certificate and seal; when charged; marriage licenses and records; fees.

County clerks shall receive no fee for the performance of the following services: For issuing certificates of election; for performing the duties of clerk of the county board; for taking acknowledgments of claims against the county; for attesting or certifying any document authorized by the county board or required by the departments of the state; or for recording Army or Navy discharges or furnishing certified copies thereof to be used in connection with any claim for compensation or disability. A charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for any other certificate and seal unless otherwise provided. The fees collected shall be credited to the county general fund.

County clerks shall receive a fee of fifty dollars for the entire proceedings of issuing a marriage license, administering the related oaths or affirmations, and recording a marriage certificate. An additional fee of sixteen dollars shall be made for each certified copy of a marriage record on file in the office of the county clerk. Both such fees shall be deposited in the county general fund.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 14, p. 167;

R.S.1913, § 2434;

C.S.1922, § 2374;

C.S.1929, § 33-113;

Laws 1931, c. 68, § 1, p. 187;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-113;

R.S.1943, § 33-110;

Laws 1949, c. 93, § 6, p. 247;

Laws 1953, c. 116, § 1, p. 371;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1126, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 202, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB88, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB596, § 9.
July 18, 2026